Louisiana, session 2026, HB576.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 5-S of Title 25 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 25:380.161 through 380.166, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 5-S. OLD GOVERNOR'S MANSION
§380.161. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter, the following terms shall have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly provides otherwise:
(1) "Department" means the Department of State.
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of state.
§380.162. Establishment and location; purpose and use
A. The Old Governor's Mansion is established as a facility in the City of
Baton Rouge under the overall jurisdiction of the department, as more specifically
provided in this Chapter.
B. The secretary shall have custody, control, and supervision of maintenance
of the Old Governor's Mansion and its contents. Title to the Old Governor's Mansion
shall remain in the state of Louisiana, along with all buildings and other
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 576 ENROLLED
improvements constructed thereon. All of the management, functions, programs, and
operations of every kind of the Old Governor's Mansion shall be exercised and
performed by the secretary.
C. For purposes of administration and supervision of the Old Governor's
Mansion, the secretary shall have full authority over its grounds and all other
buildings and improvements constructed thereon, and shall control any use made
thereof and the space therein.
D. The Old Governor's Mansion shall be a historical, cultural, and
educational institution whose primary purpose shall be to collect, preserve, and
present, as an educational resource, documents, artifacts, objects of art, and the like,
that reflect the politics, history, art, and culture of Louisiana.
§380.163. Operations
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and in particular the
provisions of R.S. 41:1212, the secretary may enter into contracts and agreements
with any public agency or nonprofit corporation which has been established for the
primary purpose of supporting the programs and activities of the Old Governor's
Mansion for the establishment of offices, stores, or exhibits on the property of and
in the Old Governor's Mansion. The secretary may also enter into contracts and
agreements for joint construction, equipment, maintenance, and financing thereof,
and may enter into contracts and agreements for the joint financing, supervision, and
conduct of cooperative enterprises and undertakings. Any public agency may enter
into contracts and agreements with the secretary for the purposes mentioned in this
Section.
§380.164. Operating funds
A. The legislature shall provide sufficient funds for the proper operation of
the Old Governor's Mansion.
B.(1) If sufficient funds necessary for the operation of the Old Governor's
Mansion are not appropriated by the legislature, and funds from other local, public,
or private sources are not available for this purpose, the department may temporarily
close the Old Governor's Mansion to the public until such time as sufficient funds
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 576 ENROLLED
necessary for the operation of the Old Governor's Mansion are appropriated by the
legislature. The department shall maintain the Old Governor's Mansion during any
period of temporary closure.
(2) The department may accept and use, in accordance with law, gifts,
grants, bequests, donations, endowments, or funds from any public or private source
to support operations of the Old Governor's Mansion.
§380.165. Donations and loans; disposition of abandoned loans
A. The secretary may solicit and accept funds, governmental grants,
donations, and contributions of lands, buildings, monies, relics, works of art, or other
property on behalf of and as additions to the Old Governor's Mansion either in the
form of loans or in the form of donations inter vivos or mortis causa, and the
secretary may acquire them by purchase, lease, or otherwise, subject to the terms,
conditions, or limitations contained in the instrument by which such property is
acquired. However, the secretary shall be empowered and authorized to enter into
any and all contracts with any person, lender, or donor that he may deem fit, proper,
and necessary to accept and receive such lands, buildings, monies, relics, works of
art, or other property on behalf of and as additions to the Old Governor's Mansion.
The Old Governor's Mansion is specifically empowered to serve as the beneficiary
of any public trust heretofore or hereafter created for such purpose pursuant to the
provisions of R.S. 9:2341 through 2347.
B. The secretary is granted the authority of deaccession with respect to any
collections of the Old Governor's Mansion and for such purpose is specifically
exempted from the laws of the state relative to the sale or disposal of surplus
property. The secretary shall establish policies and procedures necessary to carry out
this authority in an orderly manner.
C.(1) Any property which has been deposited with the Old Governor's
Mansion, by loan or otherwise, and which has been held by the Old Governor's
Mansion for more than ten years, and to which no person has made a claim shall be
deemed to be abandoned and, notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 1 of Title
XII of Book III of the Civil Code, shall become the property of the Old Governor's
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 576 ENROLLED
Mansion, provided that the secretary of state has published a notice and listing of the
property in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the parish at least once
per week for two consecutive weeks. The notice shall contain:
(a) The name and last known address, if any, of the last known owner or
depositor of the property.
(b) A description of the property.
(c) A statement that if proof of claim is not presented by the owner to the
secretary and if the owner's right to receive such property is not established to the
satisfaction of the secretary within sixty-five days from the date of the second
published notice, the property will be deemed abandoned and shall become the
property of the Old Governor's Mansion.
(2) If no valid claim is made to the property within sixty-five days from the
date of the second published notice, title to the property shall vest in the Old
Governor's Mansion free from all claims of the owner and all persons claiming
through or under him.
§380.166. Use of collections
The collections of the Old Governor's Mansion may be lent in part subject to
approval by the secretary. The secretary shall ensure proper safeguards for their
maintenance and return and shall ensure that proper records are kept.
Section 2. R.S. 49:141 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§141. Division of State Buildings; superintendent; duties
A. There is created the Division of State Buildings in the office of the
governor which shall be administered by a superintendent of state buildings
appointed by the governor. The superintendent of state buildings shall have charge
of the management, operation, and maintenance of general public buildings of the
state, including both the old and new governor's mansions the new governor's
mansion.
B. The Division of State Buildings shall have custody and supervision of
maintenance of the Old Governor's Mansion. Title to said property shall remain in
the state of Louisiana, along with all buildings and other improvements constructed
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 576 ENROLLED
thereon. The buildings and grounds shall be maintained by the superintendent of
state buildings out of regular appropriations made for such purposes.
C. For purposes of administration and supervision of the Old Governor's
Mansion, the commissioner of administration shall have full authority over its
grounds and all other buildings and improvements constructed thereon, and shall
control any use made thereof and the space therein. He shall have further authority
to transfer custody, supervision, and general administrative control for purposes of
historic preservation, heritage education, maintenance, protection, and promotion of
the building, historical collections, and artifacts and the historical integrity of the site
to any public agency or nonprofit corporation with sufficient resources necessary to
operate the said facility consistent therewith as its custodian in order to administer
and to insure the future of the mansion and the value of its collections; and to honor
the relationships and trusts established in the early years with the governors and their
families who donated personal items for such purposes, as the said commissioner of
administration may deem appropriate, according to the constitution and laws of the
state of Louisiana, including R.S. 39:11 et seq.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.